Utah statutes.
63A-1-115.   Study of administrative support functions.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Administrative support function" means a function that:

(i)  supports the operation of an entity;

(ii)  is common in most entities; and

(iii)  is not a primary purpose or duty of an entity.

(b)  "Entity" means a department or other stand-alone unit of the executive branch of state government, or a unit within a department that does not receive an administrative support function from the department, that receives an annual base-budget appropriation from the General Fund of $30 million or less.

(2)  The executive director, in consultation with the Department of Human Resource Management, shall:

(a)  study the administrative support functions performed in at least 10 entities;

(b)  recommend whether the department or another executive branch agency should perform the administrative support functions on behalf of an entity the executive director studies; and

(c)  evaluate the feasability of transferring administrative support functions to the department or another executive branch agency by July 1, 2013.

(3)  The study shall:

(a)  identify an employee who performs an administrative support function and the administrative support functions performed;

(b)  calculate the amount of time an employee spends performing the administrative support function;

(c)  estimate what percentage of the employee's duties constitute performing an administrative support function; and

(d)  evaluate whether the centralization of an administrative support function at the department or another executive branch agency would result in:

(i)  efficiency by saving time spent on administrative support functions by an employee;

(ii)  reduced costs by creating economies of scale; or

(iii)  increased quality through the standardization of a practice or procedure.

(4)  The executive director shall submit the results of the study and recommendations on or before September 19, 2012, to the Government Operations Interim Committee and the Executive Appropriations Committee.



Enacted by Chapter 266, 2012 General Session

